Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-1484
Clerk of the Legislature; refer statements to commission; additional details.

The Clerk of the Legislature shall promptly refer all such statements to the commission which may require the lobbyist or the principal to furnish additional details with respect to the matters which are or should be included in such statements. The Legislature itself may at any time require the furnishing of such additional details.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 84;

Laws 1994, LB 872, § 7;

Laws 1994, LB 1243, § 8.